Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 3. Incorporated Towns

§ 5-6-301.
Punishment of persons convicted before judge; maximum penalty permitted;
power to punish for contempt.

A person convicted before a municipal judge shall be fined and imprisoned as provided by ordinance. Except as provided by W.S. 15-1-103(a)(xli) or subsection (c) of this section, no fine shall exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), and no imprisonment shall exceed six (6) months.

The municipal judge shall punish for contempt in the same manner as district court. Before any person is imprisoned for the willful refusal to pay a fine, the court shall determine whether the defendant has an ability to pay or that a reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay.

A district court has jurisdiction to grant injunctive relief and to impose any civil penalty authorized by ordinance adopted pursuant to W.S. 15-1-103(a)(xlvi).

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 106, § 49; R.S. 1887, § 493; R.S. 1899, § 1570; C.S. 1910, § 1602; C.S. 1920, § 1772; R.S. 1931, § 22-1445; C.S. 1945, § 29-448; W.S. 1957, § 5-135; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1; 1991, ch. 206, § 1; 1996, ch. 75, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 201; 2011, ch. 129, § 101.

Cross references. —

As to power of justices of the peace to punish for contempt, see §§

1-21-901

through

1-21-909

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), substituted “district court” for “justice of the peace.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), added the second sentence.

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Hoke v. Owens, 733 P.2d 240,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 5-6-302.
Appeals
from municipal court.

Appeals from the judgment
or sentence of a municipal court may be taken to the district court
in the same manner as is now provided by law for appeals from circuit
courts in criminal cases, and shall be dealt with by the courts as
criminal cases.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 106, § 50; R.S. 1887, § 494; R.S. 1899, § 1571; C.S. 1910, § 1603; C.S. 1920, § 1773; R.S. 1931, § 22-1446; C.S. 1945, § 29-449; W.S. 1957, § 5-136; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appeals in connection with municipal courts, see §

5-6-106

.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “a municipal court” for “such police justice,” and “circuit courts” for “justices' courts.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Defendant is entitled to jury trial

when he has appealed to the district court from a judgment in the police court. State ex rel. Suchta v. District Court, 74 Wyo. 48, 283 P.2d 1023,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1955).

As case is on same footing as state criminal cases. —

By the term “criminal cases” is meant cases in violation of the laws of the state. When a case of violation of an ordinance reaches the district court on appeal, the violation of such ordinance is considered to be on the same footing as a crime under the criminal laws of the state and must, under this section, be tried in the same manner. Trials under the criminal law of this state are jury trials not only when the case originates in the district court, but also when it originates in a justice court and is then appealed, for on the appeal the trial is de novo. State ex rel. Suchta v. District Court, 74 Wyo. 48, 283 P.2d 1023,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1955).

Quoted

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

Stated

in

Cisneros v. City of Casper, 479 P.2d 198,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1971).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

§ 5-6-303.
Disposition of fines and penalties.

All fines and penalties collected, arising from a breach of the ordinances of the town, shall be paid into the town treasury. If a town enacts an ordinance prescribing a court automation fee as provided in W.S. 5-6-108(a)(i), up to ten dollars ($10.00) of the fee may be retained by the town solely for the purpose of defraying costs and expenses related to establishing and maintaining an electronic citation system. The system shall collect and submit data in a form and manner prescribed by the supreme court to comply with the requirements of the judicial systems automation account under W.S.

5-2-120

. The remaining portion of the fee shall be remitted to the judicial systems automation account established by W.S.

5-2-120

. If a town enacts an ordinance prescribing an indigent civil legal services fee as provided in W.S. 5-6-108(a)(ii), the fee shall be remitted to the indigent civil legal services account established by W.S.

5-2-121

.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 106, § 51; R.S. 1887, § 495; R.S. 1899, § 1572; C.S. 1910, § 1604; C.S. 1920, § 1775; R.S. 1931, § 22-1448; C.S. 1945, § 29-450; W.S. 1957, § 5-137; Laws 2000, ch. 25, § 2; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2015 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “W.S.

5-6-108

(a)(i)” for “W.S.

5-6-108

”; and added the present last sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “up to one-half (1/2) of the fee may be retained by the town solely for the purpose of defraying costs and expenses related to establishing and maintaining an electronic citation system. The system shall collect and submit data in a form and manner prescribed by the supreme court to comply with the requirements of the judicial systems automation account under
W.S.

5-2-120

. The remaining portion of” following “ W.S. 5-6-108(a)(i)” in the former next-to-last sentence.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “up to ten dollars ($10.00) of the fee” for “up to one half (1/2) of the fee” in the second sentence.

§ 5-6-304.
Citizens qualified to try causes where town a party.

No person shall be an
incompetent judge, justice or juror by reason of his being an inhabitant
or freeholder in such town, in any action or proceedings in which
such town may be a party in interest.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 43, § 16; R.S. 1899, § 1583; C.S. 1910, § 1615; C.S. 1920, § 1778; R.S. 1931, § 22-1451; C.S. 1945, § 29-454; W.S. 1957, § 5-138.